Washington statutes.
RCW 36.70.880

Zoning adjustor—Action final unless appealed.

The action by the zoning adjustor on all matters coming before him or her shall be final and conclusive unless within ten days after the zoning adjustor has made his or her order, requirement, decision or determination, an appeal in writing is filed with the board of adjustment. Such an appeal may be taken by the original applicant, or by opponents of record in the case.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4120; 1963 c 4 s 36.70.880. Prior: 1959 c 201 s 88.]